Kentucky statutes. TITLE VI Financial Administration
Claims for Compensation by Crime Victims

49.260.
KRS 49.270 to 49.490 applicable to power and authority of Crime Victims Compensation Board outlined in KRS 49.020.

KRS

49.270

to

49.490

shall apply to the power and authority of the Crime Victims Compensation Board outlined in KRS

49.020

.

HISTORY:

2017 ch. 74, § 26, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 36, effective June 29, 2021.

49.270.
Public purpose of indemnifying injured crime victims.

The General Assembly hereby declares that it serves a public purpose and is of benefit to the state to indemnify those needy persons who are innocent victims of criminal acts and who suffer bodily or psychological injury or death as a consequence thereof. Such persons or their dependents may thereby suffer disability, incur financial hardships and become dependent upon public assistance. To that end, it is the General Assembly’s intent that aid, care, and support be provided by the state, as a matter of grace, for such victims of crime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 1; 1984, ch. 382, § 16, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 299, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; renumbered from §

346.010

by 2017 ch. 74, § 27, effective June 29, 2017.

49.280.
Definitions for KRS 49.270 to 49.490.

As used in KRS

49.270

to

49.490

, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Child” means any person less than eighteen (18) years of age;

“Claimant” means any of the following claiming compensation under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

: a victim, a dependent of a deceased victim, a third person other than a collateral source, or an authorized person acting on behalf of any of them who is legally responsible for the expenses incurred by the victim as a result of the crime committed against the victim;

“Criminally injurious conduct” means conduct that occurs or is attempted in this jurisdiction, poses a substantial threat of personal physical, psychological injury, or death, and is punishable by fine, imprisonment, or death. Criminally injurious conduct shall include an act of terrorism, as defined in 18

U.S.C. sec. 2331

, committed outside of the United States against a resident of Kentucky. Acts which, but for the insanity or mental irresponsibility or lack of capacity of the perpetrator, would constitute criminal conduct shall be deemed to be criminally injurious conduct. The operation of a motor vehicle, motorcycle, train, boat, aircraft, or other vehicle in violation of law does not constitute a criminally injurious conduct unless the injury or death was intentionally inflicted or involved a violation of KRS

189A.010

, driving under the influence;

“Family,” when used with reference to a person, shall mean:

Any person related to such person within the third degree of consanguinity;

Any person maintaining a sexual relationship with such person; or

Any person residing in the same household with such person; and

“Victim” means a needy person who suffers personal physical or psychological injury or death from a criminal act in Kentucky as a result of:

Criminally injurious conduct;

A good-faith effort to prevent criminally injurious conduct; or

A good-faith effort to apprehend a person reasonably suspected of engaging in criminally injurious conduct.

“Victim” shall also mean a resident who is a victim of a crime occurring outside this state if:

The crime would be compensable had it occurred inside this state; and

The crime occurred in a state which does not have a crime victim compensation program, for which the victim is eligible as eligibility is set forth in KRS

49.310

.

“Victim” shall also mean a resident of this state who is injured or killed by an act of terrorism, as defined in 18

U.S.C. sec. 2331

, committed outside the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 2; 1978, ch. 213, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 172, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 165, § 22, effective July 13, 1984; 1984, ch. 382, § 17, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 299, § 2, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 409, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 368, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; renumbered from §

346.020

by 2017 ch. 74, § 28, effective June 29, 2017.

49.290.
Nonresident victims of criminal acts occurring in Kentucky — Limits on operation of statute.

“Victim” shall also include nonresidents of this state who suffer losses as a direct result of criminal acts occurring within this state.

This section shall be operative only during those time periods during which the Crime Victims Compensation Board determines that federal funds are available to the state for the compensation of victims of crime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 409, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered from §

346.025

by 2017 ch. 74, § 29, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 37, effective June 29, 2021.

49.300.
Powers and duties of Crime Victims Compensation Board.

In addition to the powers and authority outlined in KRS

49.020

, the Crime Victims Compensation Board shall have the following powers and duties:

To promulgate, amend, and repeal suitable administrative regulations to carry out the provisions and purposes of KRS

49.270

to

49.490

, including administrative regulations for the approval of attorney’s fees for representation before the board or upon judicial review;

To hear and determine all matters relating to claims for compensation, and the power to reinvestigate or reopen claims without regard to statutes of limitations;

To request from prosecuting attorneys and law enforcement officers investigations and data to enable the board to determine whether, and the extent to which, a claimant qualifies for compensation. The statute providing confidentiality for juvenile session of District Court records does not apply to proceedings under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

;

To hold hearings in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13B. The powers provided in this subsection may be delegated by the board to any member or employee thereof. If necessary to carry out any of its powers and duties, the board may petition any Circuit Court for an order;

Upon the filing of an application by a claimant, to negotiate binding fee settlements with the providers of services to claimants that may be eligible for an award under KRS 49.370(3);

To make available for public inspection all board decisions and opinions, administrative regulations, written statements of policy, and interpretations formulated, promulgated, or used by it in discharging its functions;

To publicize widely the availability of reparations and information regarding the claims therefor; and

To make an annual report, by January 1 of each year, of its activities for the preceding fiscal year to the Office of the State Budget Director and to the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue. Each such report shall set forth a complete operating and financial statement covering its operations during the year.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 4; 1980, ch. 188, § 179, effective July 15, 1980; 1996, ch. 318, § 328, effective July 15, 1996; 2002, ch. 183, § 23, effective August 1, 2002; 2013, ch. 69, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; renumbered from §

346.040

by 2017 ch. 74, § 30, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 38, effective June 29, 2021.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/25/97).
1996 Ky. Acts ch. 318, sec. 357, effective July 15, 1996, repealed KRS

346.110

, which is cited in subsection (2) of this statute. Judicial review in this area is now treated by
KRS 346.080(8).

49.310.
Eligibility for awards pursuant to KRS 49.270 to 49.490.

Except as provided in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the following persons shall be eligible for awards pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

:

A victim of criminally injurious conduct;

A surviving spouse, parent, or child of a victim of criminally injurious conduct who died as a direct result of such conduct;

Any other person dependent for his principal support upon a victim of criminally injurious conduct who died as a direct result of such crime; and

Any person who is legally responsible for the medical expenses or funeral expenses of a victim.

No victim or dependent shall be denied compensation solely because he is she is a relative of the offender or was living with the offender as a family or household member at the time of the injury or death. However, the Crime Victims Compensation Board may award compensation to a victim or dependent who is a relative, family, or household member of the offender only if the board can reasonably determine the offender will not receive significant economic benefit or unjust enrichment from the compensation.

No compensation of any kind shall be awarded when injury occurred while the victim was confined in any state, county, urban-county, or city jail, prison, or other correctional facility, or any state institution maintained and operated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 5; 1986, ch. 299, § 3, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 409, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 426, § 567, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 99, § 612, effective June 20, 2005; renumbered from §

346.050

by 2017 ch. 74, § 31, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 39, effective June 29, 2021.

49.320.
Victim of hate crime deemed victim of criminally injurious conduct.

A person who suffers personal injury as a result of conduct in violation of KRS

532.031

is a victim of criminally injurious conduct as defined in KRS

49.280

and is eligible for awards pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 606, § 53, effective July 15, 1998; renumbered from §

346.055

by 2017 ch. 74, § 32, effective June 29, 2017.

49.330.
Application for award — Filing of claim form — Effect of pending criminal prosecution on proceedings of Crime Victims Compensation Board.

A claim form may be filed by a person eligible to receive an award, as provided in KRS

49.310

or, if such person is a minor, by his parent or guardian.

A claim form must be filed by the claimant not later than five (5) years after the occurrence of the criminally injurious conduct upon which such claim is based, or not later than five (5) years after the death of the victim; provided, however, that upon good cause shown, the Crime Victims Compensation Board may extend the time for filing if, in a particular case, the interest of justice so requires.

Claims shall be filed with the board in accordance with the administrative regulations promulgated by the board. Only printed claim forms supplied by the board shall be accepted. The board shall accept for filing all claims submitted by persons eligible under subsection (1) of this section and alleging the jurisdiction requirements set forth in KRS

49.270

to

49.490

and meeting the requirements as to form in the rules and regulations of the board.

Upon filing of a claim pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

, the board shall promptly notify the United States attorney (if a federal offense is involved), the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney of the county wherein the crime is alleged to have occurred. If, within ten (10) days after such notification, such United States attorney, Commonwealth’s attorney, or county attorney advises the board that a criminal prosecution is pending upon the same alleged crime and requests that action by the board be deferred, the board shall defer all proceedings under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

until such time as such criminal prosecution has been concluded and shall so notify such United States attorney, Commonwealth’s or county attorney, and the claimant. When such criminal prosecution has been concluded, such United States attorney, Commonwealth’s, or county attorney shall promptly so notify the board. Nothing in this section shall limit the authority of the board to grant emergency awards pursuant to KRS

49.360

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 6; 1978, ch. 297, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 172, § 2, effective June 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 299, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 409, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 606, § 37, effective July 15, 1998; renumbered from §

346.060

by 2017 ch. 74, § 33, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 40, effective June 29, 2021.

49.340.
Investigation of claim — Examination of records and reports — Hearing — Expenses of hearings outside offices — Order — Appeal.

A claim, when accepted for filing, shall be assigned by the executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals to an investigator for investigation. All claims arising from the death of an individual as a direct result of a crime shall be considered together.

The investigator to whom such claim is assigned shall examine the papers filed in support of the claim and the validity of the claim. The investigation shall include but not be limited to an examination of police, court, and official records and reports concerning the crime.

If the mental, physical, or emotional condition of a victim or claimant is material to a claim, the board may order the victim or claimant to submit to a mental or physical examination by a physician or psychiatrist, and may order an autopsy of a deceased victim. A report upon an examination shall be filed with the investigator setting out findings, including results of all tests made, diagnosis, prognosis, and other conclusions.

For purposes of KRS

49.270

to

49.490

, there is no privilege, except privileges arising from the attorney-client relationship, as to communications or records relevant to an issue of the physical, mental, or emotional condition of the claimant or victim in a proceeding under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

in which that condition is an element.

Claims shall be investigated and determined, regardless of whether the alleged criminal has been apprehended or prosecuted for or convicted of any crime based upon the same incident, or has been acquitted, or found not guilty of the crime in question owing to criminal irresponsibility or other legal exemption.

Upon completion of the investigator’s report, the claim shall be assigned to a board member who may decide the claim in favor of a claimant in the amount claimed on the basis of the papers filed in support thereof and the report of the investigation of the claim within thirty (30) days of the assignment of the claim. If the board member is unable to decide the claim upon the basis of the documents and the report, a hearing shall be ordered.

The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B and may be held at any location within the Commonwealth, with a view to securing opportunity for crime victims to appear before it with as little inconvenience and expense as practicable. When any member of the board is attending hearings at any place other than Frankfort, Kentucky, expenses necessarily incurred in the performance of such duty shall be paid by the state upon certification by the executive director of the Office of Claims and Appeals of an itemized statement of such expenses in accordance with Finance and Administration Cabinet administrative regulations.

After examining the papers filed in support of the claim and the report of investigation, and after a hearing, if any, the board member to whom the claim was assigned shall issue a recommended order either granting an award pursuant to KRS

49.370

or deny the claim. The board shall review the recommended order and any exceptions filed to it, and shall by majority vote issue a final order.

A final order of the board may be appealed by filing a petition for judicial review in the county where the claim accrued or in Franklin Circuit Court in accordance with KRS Chapter 13B.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 8; 1990, ch. 409, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 318, § 329, effective July 15, 1996; renumbered from §

346.080

by 2017 ch. 74, § 34, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 41, effective June 29, 2021.

49.350.
Failure to perfect claim — Denial and bar to reassertion of claim.

Following the initial filing of a claim, if a claimant or victim does not take such further steps as may be necessary to support or perfect the claim as may be required by the Crime Victims Compensation Board within thirty (30) days after such requirement is made by the board, the claimant or victim shall be deemed in default. In such case the board shall summarily deny the claim and the claimant or victim shall be forever barred from reasserting the claim. The board may remit such proceedings on good cause shown that the failure to take the steps required by the board was totally and completely beyond the control of the claimant or victim.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 10; renumbered from §

346.100

by 2017 ch. 74, § 35, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 42, effective June 29, 2021.

49.360.
Emergency award pending final decision.

Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS

49.340

, if it appears to the Crime Victims Compensation Board member to whom a claim is assigned, prior to taking action upon such claim that:

Such claim is one with respect to which an award probably will be made; and

Undue hardship will result to the claimant if immediate payment is not made; emergency payment under subsection (2) of this section may be made.

Upon such findings under subsection (1) of this section, the board member may make an emergency award to the claimant pending a final decision in the case provided that:

The amount of such emergency award shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

The amount of such emergency award shall be deducted from any final award made to the claimant; and

The excess of the amount of such emergency award over the amount of the final award, or the full amount of the emergency award if no final award is made, shall be repaid by the claimant to the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 12; renumbered from §

346.120

by 2017 ch. 74, § 36, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 43, effective June 29, 2021.

49.370.
Awards, findings, and amounts.

No award shall be made unless the Crime Victims Compensation Board or board member, as the case may be, finds that:

Criminally injurious conduct occurred;

Such criminally injurious conduct resulted in personal physical or psychological injury to, or death of, the victim; and

Police or court records show that such crime was promptly reported to the proper authorities; and in no case may an award be made where the police or court records show that such report was made more than forty-eight (48) hours after the occurrence of such crime unless the board, for good cause shown, finds the delay to have been justified.

Except for claims related to sexual assault, human trafficking, and domestic violence, the board upon finding that the claimant or victim has not fully cooperated with appropriate law enforcement agencies shall deny, reconsider, or reduce an award.

Any award made pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

shall be in an amount not exceeding out-of-pocket expenses, including indebtedness reasonably incurred for medical or other services, including mental health counseling, necessary as a result of the injury upon which the claim is based, together with loss of earnings or support resulting from such injury. Mental health counseling shall be paid for a maximum of two (2) years, but only after proper documentation is submitted to the board stating what treatment is planned and for what period of time. The board shall have the power to discontinue payment of mental health counseling at any time within the two (2) year period. Replacement of eyeglasses and other corrective lenses shall be included in an award, provided they were stolen, destroyed, or damaged during the crime.

Any award made for loss of earnings or financial support may be considered for a claimant who has loss of support or wages due to the crime for which the claim is filed. Unless reduced pursuant to other provisions of KRS

49.270

to

49.490

, the award shall be equal to net earnings at the time of the criminally injurious conduct; however, no such award shall exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) for each week of lost earnings or financial support. The wage earner or source of support must have been employed or paying support at the time the crime occurred. Said employment or support shall be verified by the staff of the board after information is provided by the claimant or victim. Should the claimant or victim fail to supply the board with the information requested, the portion of the claim for lost wages or support shall be denied. If there are two (2) or more persons entitled to an award as a result of the injury or death of a person which is the direct result of criminally injurious conduct, the award shall be apportioned by the board among the claimants.

The board is authorized to set a reasonable limit for the payment of funeral and burial expenses which shall include funeral costs, a monument, and grave plot. In no event shall an award for funeral expenses exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000).

Any award made under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

shall not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) in total compensation to be received by or paid on behalf of a claimant from the fund.

No award shall be made for any type of property loss or damage, except as otherwise permitted in KRS

49.270

to

49.490

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 13; 1978, ch. 213, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 172, § 4, effective June 15, 1980; 1986, ch. 299, § 5, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 409, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 606, § 38, effective July 15, 1998; 2013, ch. 69, § 4, effective June 25, 2013; renumbered from §

346.130

by 2017 ch. 74, § 37, effective June 29, 2017; 2020 ch. 75, § 2, effective July 15, 2020; 2021 ch. 185, § 44, effective June 29, 2021.

49.380.
Collection actions against crime victim for debt related to expense covered under KRS 49.370(3) to cease pending resolution of claim submitted to board.

Upon the filing of an application for a claim with the Crime Victims Compensation Board, all debt collection actions by a creditor or the creditor’s agent, against the claimant for a debt or expense covered under KRS 49.370(3) and related to the substance of the claim shall cease pending a resolution of the claim by the board, if the claimant:

Provides written notice to the creditor or creditor’s agent that a claim has been submitted to the board; and

Authorizes the creditor or creditor’s agent to confirm with the board the claimant’s application with the board and that the debt or expense upon which the collection action is based may be covered under KRS 49.370(3).

The board shall, upon the written request of a creditor or creditor’s agent, notify the creditor or creditor’s agent when a claim has been resolved.

History.

Enact. Acts 2013, ch. 69, § 3, effective June 25, 2013; renumbered from §

346.135

by 2017 ch. 74, § 38, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 45, effective June 29, 2021.

49.390.
Reduction of award — Determination of victim’s contribution — Basis of denial of claim.

Any award made pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

shall be reduced by the amount of any payments received or to be received by the claimant as a result of the injury from the following sources:

From or on behalf of the person who committed the crime;

Under insurance programs mandated by law;

From public funds;

Under any contract of insurance wherein the claimant is the insured or beneficiary;

As an emergency award pursuant to KRS

49.360

; and

From donations made on behalf of the victim or claimant toward expenses incurred as a result of the crime.

In determining the amount of an award, the Crime Victims Compensation Board or board member shall determine whether, because of his or her conduct, the claimant or the victim of such crime contributed to the infliction of the victim’s injury, and shall reduce the amount of the award or reject the claim altogether, in accordance with such determination; however, the board or board member may disregard for this purpose the responsibility of the claimant or the victim for the victim’s injury where the record shows that such responsibility was attributable to efforts by the claimant or victim to prevent a crime or an attempted crime from occurrence in his or her presence or to apprehend a person who had committed a crime in his or her presence or had in fact committed a felony. The board or board members may request that either the county attorney or Commonwealth’s attorney or both state whether in their opinion, the victim suffered injuries as the result of a crime and has cooperated with the prosecution and law enforcement authorities. The board or board member shall not be bound by such opinions and recommendations and if needed may order a further investigation of the claim.

The board or board member may consider whether the victim’s injuries were the ordinary and foreseeable result of unlawful and criminal activities in determining the claimant’s eligibility for an award. If the board or board member finds that the claimant will not suffer serious financial hardship if not granted financial assistance pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

, the board or board member shall deny an award. In determining such serious financial hardship, the board or board member shall consider all of the financial resources of the claimant. The board shall establish specific standards by rule for determining such serious financial hardships.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 14; 1980, ch. 172, § 5, effective July 15, 1980; 2013, ch. 69, § 5, effective June 25, 2013; renumbered from §

346.140

by 2017 ch. 74, § 39, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 46, effective June 29, 2021.

49.400.
Effect of filing false information.

Any person who procures or attempts to procure compensation with the Crime Victims Compensation Board by filing false information shall have the claim denied and be forever barred from filing a claim with this board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 409, § 8, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered from §

346.145

by 2017 ch. 74, § 40, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 47, effective June 29, 2021.

49.410.
Manner of payment — Annual reconsideration.

The award shall be paid in a lump sum, except that in the case of death or protracted disability the award shall provide for periodic payments to compensate for loss of earnings or support. No award made pursuant to KRS

49.270

to

49.490

shall be subject to execution or attachment other than for expenses resulting from the injury which is the basis for the claim.

The Crime Victims Compensation Board shall reconsider at least annually every award being paid in installments. An order or reconsideration of an award shall not require refund of amounts previously paid unless the award was obtained by fraud.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 15; renumbered from §

49.410

by 2017 ch. 74, § 41, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 48, effective June 29, 2021.

49.420.
Lump-sum payment to survivors of police officer killed in line of duty.

The Crime Victims Compensation Board may award a lump-sum payment not to exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) to the family of a police officer employed by a city, county, or urban-county government who is killed in the line of duty as a police officer for such city, county, or urban-county and who is not eligible to receive death or disability benefits under a pension plan of the city, county, or urban-county.

This section shall apply to any officer killed in the line of duty since January 1, 1986.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 324, § 1, effective April 4, 1986; 1990, ch. 409, § 9, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered from §

346.155

by 2017 ch. 74, § 42, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 49, effective June 29, 2021.

49.430.
Federal participation.

The Crime Victims Compensation Board may apply for funds from, and submit all necessary forms to, any federal agency participating in a cooperative program to compensate victims of crime.

History.

Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 409, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; renumbered from §

346.157

by 2017 ch. 74, § 43, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 50, effective June 29, 2021.

49.440.
Records of proceedings are public records — Confidentiality protected.

The Crime Victims Compensation Board shall maintain the official record of the claim, including evidence entered into the record at a hearing on the claim, and the final action taken on each claim. All records of proceedings shall be public records; provided, however, that any record or report obtained by the board, the confidentiality of which is protected by any other law or regulation, shall remain confidential subject to such law or regulation.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 16; renumbered from §

346.160

by 2017 ch. 74, § 44, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 51, effective June 29, 2021.

49.450.
Contracts regarding crime — Money to be paid to Crime Victims Compensation Board — Disposition.

Every person contracting with any person or the representative or assignee of any person accused or convicted of a crime in this state, with respect to the reenactment of such crime, by way of a movie, book, magazine article, radio, or television presentation, live entertainment of any kind, or from the expression of such person’s thoughts, feelings, opinions, or emotions regarding such crime, shall pay over to the Crime Victims Compensation Board any moneys which would otherwise, by terms of such contract, be owing to the person so accused or convicted or his representatives.

After deducting all sums paid to the victim by the board, the board shall deposit such moneys in its accounts for the benefit of and payable to any victim of crimes committed by such person, provided that such person is eventually convicted of the crime and provided further that such victim, within five (5) years of the date of the crime, brings a civil action in a court of competent jurisdiction and recovers a money judgment against such person or his or her representatives.

Upon disposition of charges favorable to any person accused of committing a crime, or upon a showing by such person that five (5) years have elapsed from the board’s receipt of such funds and that such person has not been convicted of said crime and further that no actions are pending against such person in connection with the crime or pursuant to this section, the board shall immediately pay over any such moneys to such person.

Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of the civil practice law and rules with respect to the timely bringing of an action, the five (5) year period provided for in subsection (2) of this section shall not begin to run until the board has received such moneys.

Any action taken by any person convicted of a crime, whether by way of execution of a power of attorney, creation of corporate entities, or otherwise, to defeat the purpose of this section shall be null and void as against the public policy of this state.

The failure of a person to pay moneys to the board in accordance with subsection (1) shall create a debt due and owing to the board from that person and shall constitute a preferential lien to the state which may be collected by the board by civil process.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 297, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; renumbered from §

346.165

by 2017 ch. 74, § 45, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 52, effective June 29, 2021.

49.460.
Subrogation.

No right of action at law against a person who has committed a criminal act for damages as a consequence of such act shall be lost as a consequence of receiving benefits under the provisions of KRS

49.270

to

49.490

. In the event any person receiving benefits under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

additionally seeks a remedy for damages from the person or persons who have committed the criminal act resulting in damages, then and in that event the Crime Victims Compensation Board shall be subrogated to and have a lien upon any recovery so made to the extent of the payments made by the state to or on behalf of such person under KRS 49.270 to 49.490.

If compensation is awarded, the state is subrogated to all the claimant’s rights to receive or recover benefits or advantages, for economic loss for which and to the extent only that compensation is awarded from a source which is, or, if readily available to the victim or claimant would be, a collateral source.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 17; renumbered from §

346.170

by 2017 ch. 74, § 46, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 53, effective June 29, 2021.

49.470.
Award constitutes debt owed state — Manner of payment.

Any payment of benefits to or on behalf of a victim under KRS

49.270

to

49.490

creates a debt due and owing to the state by any person found to have committed such criminal act in either a civil or criminal court proceeding in which he is a party.

The court when placing any convicted person, who owes a debt to the state as a consequence of a criminal act, on probation and conditional discharge as provided in KRS

533.020

may set as a condition of the probation or conditional discharge the payment of the debt to the state. The court also may set the schedule or amounts of payments to be made subject to modification based on change of circumstances.

The parole board shall also have the right to make payment of the debt to the state a condition of parole under the provisions of KRS Chapter 439 subject to modification based on change of circumstances.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976, ch. 263, § 18; renumbered from §

346.180

by 2017 ch. 74, § 47, effective June 29, 2017.

49.480.
Crime victims’ compensation fund.

There is established in the State Treasury the crime victims’ compensation fund, hereinafter referred to as the “fund,” to be administered by the Crime Victims Compensation Board. Nothing herein shall be construed to limit the power of the court to order additional forms of restitution, including public or charitable work or reparation to the victim, to the fund, or otherwise as authorized by law.

The fund shall consist of moneys from the following: appropriations by the General Assembly; the federal government; disbursements provided under KRS 42.320(2)(g); and any other public or private source. Any unexpended balance remaining in the fund at the end of the biennium shall not lapse and be transferred to the general fund, but shall remain in the crime victims’ compensation fund. Any funds not utilized by the board shall be used to provide assistance to programs for victims, and the board shall allocate such funds to any agency providing services to victims. In the event there are insufficient funds in the fund to pay all claims in full, all claims shall be paid at seventy percent (70%). If there are no moneys in the fund, then no claim shall be paid until moneys have again accumulated. In addition to payment of claims, moneys in the fund shall be used to pay all the necessary and proper expenses of the board.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 420, § 1, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 299, § 6, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 409, § 11, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 606, § 42, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 183, § 24, effective August 1, 2002; renumbered from §

346.185

by 2017 ch. 74, § 48, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 54, effective June 29, 2021.

49.490.
Sexual assault victim assistance fund.

There is established in the State Treasury the sexual assault victim assistance fund to be administered by the Crime Victims Compensation Board for the purpose of funding medical examinations for victims of sexual assault as provided in subsection (4) of this section and in KRS

216B.400

. All moneys deposited or paid into the sexual assault victim assistance fund are appropriated and shall be available to the board. Funds shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the board.

The sexual assault victim assistance fund may receive state general fund appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, or other public or private funds or donations. Any federal matching funds received by the board or the crime victims’ compensation fund for sexual assault victim assistance payments shall be deposited into the sexual assault victim assistance fund.

Any unencumbered or unallocated balances in the sexual assault victim assistance fund shall be invested as provided in KRS 42.500(9). Any income earned from investment, along with the unallocated or unencumbered balances in the fund, shall not lapse and shall be deemed a trust and agency account available solely for the purposes specified in subsection (1) of this section.

For purposes of this section, a children’s advocacy center is a center as defined in KRS

620.020

that operates consistent with administrative regulations promulgated by the Cabinet for Health and Family Services.

Upon receipt of a completed original claim form supplied by the board and itemized bill for a child sexual abuse medical examination performed at a children’s advocacy center, the board shall reimburse the children’s advocacy center for actual costs up to but not exceeding the amount of reimbursement established through administrative regulation promulgated by the Department for Medicaid Services.

Independent investigation by the board shall not be required for payment of claims under this section; however, the board may require additional documentation as proof that the medical examination was performed.

If sexual assault victim assistance funds are insufficient to pay claims under subsection (4) of this section or KRS

216B.400

, payment shall be made from the crime victims’ compensation fund.

History.

Enact. Acts 2004, ch. 73, § 1, effective April 6, 2004; 2005, ch. 99, § 66, effective June 20, 2005; renumbered from §

49.410

by 2017 ch. 74, § 41, effective June 29, 2017; 2021 ch. 185, § 55, effective June 29, 2021.